Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.420

Head injury prevention—Information preparation.

The department of health, the department of licensing, and the traffic safety commission shall jointly prepare information for driver license manuals, driver education programs, and driving tests to increase driver awareness of pedestrian safety, to increase driver skills in avoiding pedestrian and motor vehicle accidents, and to determine drivers' abilities to avoid pedestrian motor vehicle accidents.

[ 1990 c 270 s 4.]